North Dakota statutes. TITLE 12.1 Criminal Code
CHAPTER 12.1-06.2 Criminal Street Gangs

12.1-06.2-01.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Crime of pecuniary gain” means any violation of state law that directly results or was intended to result in the defendant alone, or in association with others, receiving income, benefit, property, money, or anything of value.

“Crime of violence” means any violation of state law where a person purposely or knowingly causes or threatens to cause death or physical bodily injury to another person or persons.

“Criminal street gang” means any ongoing organization or group of three or more persons, whether formal or informal, that acts in concert or agrees to act in concert with a purpose that any of those persons alone or in any combination commit or will commit two or more predicate gang crimes one of which occurs after August 1, 1995, and the last of which occurred within five years after the commission of a prior predicate gang crime.

“Participate in a criminal street gang” means to act in concert with a criminal street gang with intent to commit or with the intent that any other person associated with the criminal street gang will commit one or more predicate gang crimes.

“Predicate gang crime” means the commission, attempted commission, or solicitation of any felony, misdemeanor crime of violence, or misdemeanor crime of pecuniary gain.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 124, § 1.

12.1-06.2-02.
Criminal street gang crime — Penalty.

Any person who commits a felony or class A misdemeanor crime of violence or crime of pecuniary gain for the benefit of, at the direction of, or in association with any criminal street gang, with the intent to promote, further, or assist in the affairs of a criminal gang, or obtain membership into a criminal gang, is guilty of a class C felony.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 124, § 1.

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses, penalties, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

12.1-06.2-03.
Encouraging minors to participate in criminal street gang — Penalty.

Any person eighteen years of age or older who knowingly or willfully causes, aids, abets, encourages, solicits, or recruits a person under the age of eighteen years to participate in a criminal street gang is upon conviction guilty of a class C felony.

Nothing in this section may be construed to limit prosecution under any other provision of law.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 124, § 1.

12.1-06.2-04.
Local ordinances not preempted.

Nothing in this chapter may be construed as preventing a local governing body from adopting and enforcing ordinances relating to gangs and gang-related violence.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 124, § 1.